Utah statutes.
10-3-920.   Bail commissioner -- Powers and duties.

(1)  With the advice and consent of the city council and the board of commissioners in other cities, the mayor of a city of the third, fourth, or fifth class may appoint from among the officers and members of the police department of the city one or more discreet persons as a bail commissioner.

(2)  A bail commissioner shall have authority to fix and receive bail for a person arrested within the corporate limits of the city in accordance with the uniform bail schedule adopted by the Judicial Council or a reasonable bail for city ordinances not contained in the schedule for:

(a)  misdemeanors under the laws of the state; or

(b)  violation of the city ordinances.

(3)  A person who has been ordered by a bail commissioner to give bail may deposit with the bail commissioner the amount:

(a)  in money, by cash, certified or cashier's check, personal check with check guarantee card, money order, or credit card, if the bail commissioner has chosen to establish any of those options; or

(b)  by a bond issued by a bail bond surety qualified under the rules of the Judicial Council.

(4)  Any money or bond collected by a bail commissioner shall be delivered to the appropriate court within three days of receipt of the money or bond.

(5)  The court may review the amount of bail ordered by a bail commissioner and modify the amount of bail required for good cause.



Amended by Chapter 292, 2003 General Session

